New Jersey, session 221, A5412.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection j. of section 6 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-6) to the contrary, when the position of executive director of the trust has been vacant for a period of one year or longer, the State Treasurer, in consultation with the Commissioner of Environmental Protection and the Secretary of Agriculture, may appoint an acting executive director who shall work with the members of the trust under the same authority granted to an executive director pursuant to P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.) and P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). b.  An acting executive director appointed pursuant to this section shall serve for a minimum of one year at an annual expense set by the State Treasurer not to exceed $150,000, without regard to the provisions of Title 11A, Civil Service, of the New Jersey Statutes; provided, however, that the trust shall retain all other oversight authority over the acting executive director. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.